Ohio, session 136, SB338.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 1349.57 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 1349.57. (A) The attorney general shall establish the digital safety for children office. (B) The digital safety for children office shall monitor all of the following: (1) Potential safety issues for children online; (2) Cyberbullying; (3) Children's online data collection.